DI-82

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6X0-01

DTC

C 1249 /49 Stop Light Switch Circuit

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
ECUterminalIG 1 voltageis9.5t0 17.2VandABSisin
C1249/49 non-operation, the open circuitin stop light switch circuit Stop light switch circuit
continues for 0.3 sec. or more.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-83
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-85
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of the stop light switch.

CHECK:
Check that the stop light lights up when brake pedal is depressed and turns OFF when the brake pedal is

released.
0K> Go to step 3.

B

2 | Check stop light circuit (See Pub. No. RM616E on page BE-58).

@

3 | Check voltage between terminal STP of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and body

NG> Repair or replace stop light circuit.

ground.
STP PREPARATION:
( ) Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-

nected.
CHECK:

VWV W Measure voltage between terminal STP of ABS & BA & TRC &
VSC ECU and body ground when brake pedal is depressed.

(—)/\-/\ (+) ) oK:
_[ u Voltage: 10 - 14V
N = F08298

problem symptoms chart (See page DI-23).

0K> Proceed to next circuit inspection shown in
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DI-86 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

4 | Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS & BA & TRC &
VSC ECU and stop light switch (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.
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